Washington statutes.
RCW 7.48.280

Costs of abatement.

The expense of abating a nuisance, by virtue of a warrant, can be collected by the officer in the same manner as damages and costs are collected on execution, except that the materials of any buildings, fences, or other things that may be removed as a nuisance, may be first levied upon and sold by the officer, and if any of the proceeds remain after satisfying the expense of the removal, such balance must be paid by the officer to the defendant or to the owner of the property levied upon, and if said proceeds are not sufficient to pay such expenses, the officer must collect the residue thereof.

[Code 1881 s 1252; 1875 p 82 s 18; RRS s 9928.]